Alaska statutes. Title 38. Public Land.
Article 14. Material Sales.

Effective dates. —

Section 29, ch. 27, SLA 2012 makes this article effective July 1, 2012.

Sec. 38.05.550.
Disposal of materials.

All materials owned by the state may be sold or conveyed as provided in AS

38.05.550

—

38.05.565

.

Materials may only be sold or removed from sources or sites designated by the department. The department shall issue a decision under AS

38.05.035(e)

that the sale and extraction of materials from that location is in the best interests of the state at the time each source or site is designated. The department shall give notice, in accordance with AS

38.05.945

, of the department’s decision to designate a source or site for the sale and extraction of materials. After decision and notice, the department may sell materials continuously, without further finding or notice, from that designated source or site under this section until the source or site is closed by the department.

Each sale of materials must be made through a materials sales contract on a form that has been approved by the attorney general. At the time of each sale, the department shall determine

the location of the source or site from which materials are to be removed;

the method of disposal as provided in AS

38.05.555

—

38.05.565

; and

the limitations, conditions, and terms of sale, which shall address the utilization, development, and maintenance of the source of the materials.

The commissioner shall provide for valuation of materials in or upon state land. Materials sold or conveyed under AS

38.05.550

—

38.05.565

may, at the director’s discretion, be sold at

representative regional sales prices periodically determined by the commissioner for each type of material and for defined geographic regions, under procedures established by regulation; public notice under AS

38.05.945

must be made whenever the commissioner revises the representative regional sales prices;

fair market value determined by appraisal completed and approved within two years of the date of sale; or

a price less than appraised value, determined under AS

38.05.810(a)

.

History.

(§ 18 ch 27 SLA 2012)

Sec. 38.05.555.
Negotiated sales and personal use of materials.

Notwithstanding any other provision of AS

38.05.550

—

38.05.565

, the director may negotiate the sale of any amount of materials from a source or site designated under AS

38.05.550(b)

. The period of a contract for a sale of materials negotiated under this section may not exceed five years.

Sales of materials under this section must be made at a representative regional sales price set by the commissioner under AS

38.05.550(d)(1)

unless

the director determines that it is in the best interests of the state to sell the materials at fair market value determined by an appraisal provided by the department;

the applicant, at its own cost, elects to provide an appraisal, acceptable to the department, determining the fair market value of the materials to be sold; or

the sale is to a state or federal agency or political subdivision under AS

38.05.810(a)

and the material to be extracted and removed is used for public purposes; sales under this paragraph may be at a price less than appraised value as determined by the director.

Subsequent sales of similar materials from the same source or site may be made by the department at the price established by an appraisal provided under (b) of this section.

Individual negotiated contracts for the sale of materials authorized by (a) of this section are not subject to AS

38.05.035(e)

or

38.05.945

.

Materials from a source or site designated under AS

38.05.550(b)

may be extracted and removed for personal use without cost up to a limit of two cubic yards a person within a one-calendar-year period. Extraction and removal of materials under this subsection must be approved by the department before extraction operations.

Notwithstanding (a) — (e) of this section, for the purpose of creating incentives for the development of peat as a source of heat or power, the director may negotiate the sale of peat to individuals, organized or unorganized communities, tribal governments, or private profit or nonprofit organizations. Under this subsection, the director may provide

for personal use by an individual, not more than 200 cubic yards of peat a year at no cost;

for commercial use, not more than 30,000 cubic yards of peat during a single 10-year period at no cost; or

for commercial use requiring more than 30,000 cubic yards of peat, the amount required by the user during a 10-year period beginning when the user uses more than 30,000 yards of peat at the price of

20 percent of the representative regional sales price determined by the director under AS

38.05.550(d)(1)

; or

20 percent of the fair market value determined by an appraisal completed under AS

38.05.550(d)(2)

, if the applicant provides the appraisal at the applicant’s expense and the appraisal is approved by the commissioner.

History.

(§ 18 ch 27 SLA 2012)

Sec. 38.05.560.
Competitive sales of materials.

The department shall offer materials from a source or site designated under AS

38.05.550(b)

for competitive sale if the department determines that

the sale would result in an exclusive use by the purchaser of a designated source or site;

materials available at a designated source or site are insufficient to supply all anticipated buyers;

the size of the designated source or site is too small to accommodate the extraction operations of all anticipated buyers; or

it is in the best interests of the state.

Notice of a competitive sale of materials from a source or site designated under AS

38.05.550(b)

shall be given under AS

38.05.945(a)(4)

and shall

describe the location of the designated source or site, and the type and quantity of the materials to be sold;

solicit potential bidders to register with the department to participate in the proposed sale; only persons registered to bid at a proposed sale of materials may bid; and

include the minimum bid for materials to be sold.

A notice of competitive sale required under (b) of this section may be combined with a notice required under AS

38.05.550

.

If, after notice under (b) of this section, only one potential bidder has registered to bid at a proposed competitive sale, the competitive sale may be cancelled and the materials sold by negotiation under AS

38.05.555

.

Materials sold under this section may be sold either by sealed bid or by public outcry or online auction, in the discretion of the department, to the highest qualified bidder as determined by the department. An aggrieved bidder may appeal to the commissioner under AS

44.37.011

within five days after the sale for a review of the determination. The sale shall be conducted by the director or the director’s designee, and, at the time of sale, the successful bidder shall deposit the amount specified in the terms of sale. The means by which the amount of deposit is determined shall be prescribed by regulation. The director shall immediately issue a receipt containing a description of the materials purchased, the price bid, and the terms of sale. The receipt shall be accepted in writing by the bidder. A contract of sale, on a form approved by the attorney general, shall be signed by the purchaser, and the contract shall be signed by the director on behalf of the state. The director may impose conditions, limitations, and terms considered necessary and proper to protect the interests of the state.

History.

(§ 18 ch 27 SLA 2012)

Sec. 38.05.562.
Violations.

Violation of any provision of AS

38.05.550

—

38.05.565

or the terms of the contract of sale subjects the purchaser to appropriate legal action.

History.

(§ 18 ch 27 SLA 2012)

Sec. 38.05.565.
Sale or disposal of materials for special purposes.

The department may negotiate the sale or otherwise dispose of materials from sources or sites other than those designated under AS

38.05.550(b)

to

municipalities, other state and federal agencies, or other entities under AS

38.05.872

; sales under this paragraph may be at less than fair market value, and materials may be disposed of free of charge if the director determines that the disposal is in the public interest;

a licensed public utility or a licensed common carrier under AS

38.05.810(e)

; sales under this paragraph shall be at representative regional sales prices determined under AS

38.05.550(d)(1)

; or

a holder of a permit, land lease, or right-of-way issued by the department, if the materials to be extracted and removed during the construction, use, or maintenance of a facility authorized by a permit, land lease, or right-of-way, are necessary and incidental to the primary purpose of the permit, land lease, or right-of-way, and the materials are put to beneficial use in a way that alters the character, usefulness, or availability of the materials in their native forms; the department may authorize the sale of materials under terms of the permit, land lease, or right-of-way; sales of materials under this paragraph must be at

the representative regional sales price established under AS

38.05.550(d)(1)

unless the sale is to a state or federal agency, political subdivision, or other entity under AS

38.05.810(a)

; or

a price less than appraised value as determined by the director if the sale is to a state or federal agency, political subdivision, or other entity under AS

38.05.810(a)

and the materials to be extracted and removed are used for public purposes.

If materials are moved within and not removed from the boundaries of a permit, land lease, or right-of-way issued by the department without altering the character, usefulness, or availability of the materials in their native forms, the applicant may not be required to purchase the materials.

In this section, “land lease”

means a lease issued under AS

38.05.070

—

38.05.105

;

does not include a lease issued under AS

38.05.131

—

38.05.275

.

History.

(§ 18 ch 27 SLA 2012)